Nebraska, session 109, LB382.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 68-996, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
68-996 (1) The Medicaid Managed Care Excess Profit Fund is created. The
fund shall contain money returned to the State Treasurer pursuant to
subdivision (3) of section 68-995.
(2) The fund shall first be used to offset any losses under subdivision
(2) of section 68-995 and then to provide for (a) services addressing the
health needs of adults and children under the Medical Assistance Act, including
filling service gaps, (b) providing system improvements, (c) providing
evidence-based early intervention home visitation programs, (d) providing
medical respite services, (e) translation and interpretation services, (f)
providing coverage for continuous glucose monitors as described in section
68-911, (g) providing other services sustaining access to care, (h) services
under the Nebraska Prenatal Plus Program, (i) and providing grants pursuant to
the Intergenerational Care Facility Incentive Grant Program, and (j)
reimbursement of the actual costs of providing eligible activities and services
described in section 81-2222, as determined by the Legislature. The fund shall
only be used for the purposes described in this section.
(3) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and
the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Beginning October 1, 2024, any
investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to
the General Fund.
Sec. 2. It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate two million
dollars in fiscal year 2025-26 and two million dollars in fiscal year 2026-27
from the Medicaid Managed Care Excess Profit Fund to the area agencies on aging
for the purpose of providing additional eligible activities and services as
defined in section 81-2222. An equal amount shall be distributed to each of the
state's eight area agencies on aging.
Sec. 3. Section 81-2224, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-2224 The department shall reimburse each designated area agency on
aging for seventy-five percent of the actual cost of providing eligible
activities and services as defined in section 81-2222. Such reimbursement shall
be made from (1) state funds appropriated by the Legislature, including, but
not limited to, cash fund appropriations as described in section 2 of this act,
(2) federal funds allocated to the department, including federal funds
allocated under the Older Americans Act, as now or hereafter amended, and (3)
other funds as available. The payments shall be made by the department on or
before the twentieth day of each month. If state funds appropriated, federal
funds allocated, or other funds available are insufficient to finance the
department-approved plan and budget for each designated area agency on aging,
the reimbursement to each area agency on aging shall be proportionately
reduced. If an area agency on aging chooses to exceed the budget approved by
the department, costs in excess of the approved budget shall not be reimbursed
by the department.
Sec. 4. Original section 81-2224, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
and section 68-996, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-1-